Utah statutes.
10-3-704.   Form of ordinance.
Any ordinance passed by the governing body, after the effective date of this
act, shall contain and be in substantially the following order and form:
(1)  a number;
(2)  a title which indicates the nature of the subject matter of the
ordinance;
(3)  a preamble which states the need or reason for the ordinance;
(4)  an ordaining clause which states "Be it ordained by the ____ (name of the
governing body and municipality):";
(5)  the body or subject of the ordinance;
(6)  when applicable, a statement indicating the penalty for violation of the
ordinance or a reference that the punishment is covered by an ordinance which
prescribes the fines and terms of imprisonment for the violation of a
municipal ordinance; or, the penalty may establish a classification of
penalties and refer to such ordinance in which the penalty for such violation
is established;
(7)  a statement indicating the effective date of the ordinance or the date
when the ordinance shall become effective after publication or posting as
required by this chapter;
(8)  a line for the signature of the mayor or acting mayor to sign the
ordinance;
(9)  a place for the municipal recorder to attest the ordinance and fix the
seal of the municipality; and
(10)  in municipalities where the mayor may disapprove an ordinance passed by
the legislative body, the ordinance must show, that it was passed with the
mayor's approval or that if the mayor disapproved the ordinance, that it was
passed over his disapproval. If the mayor neither approves, or disapproves an
ordinance, the ordinance should show that it became effective without the
approval or disapproval of the mayor.
